Hawaii statutes.
§171-27 Taxes. Any provision to the
contrary notwithstanding, leases and licenses issued by the board of land and
natural resources and permits issued to permittees, who are holdover lessees or
licensees, shall be subject to real property taxes which shall be assessed on a
pro rata basis against the lessee, licensee or the permittee and the lessee's,
licensee's or permittee's successor in interest.

The board shall notify the lessee, licensee, or
permittee and each holder of record having a security interest as provided in
section 171-21 of any default in the payment of the taxes and upon failure to
remedy the default within sixty days after receipt of notice of default, the
board shall cancel and terminate the lease, license, or permit without prejudice
to any other remedies the State may have against the lessee, licensee, or
permittee. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-27; am L 1967, c 234, §7; HRS
§171-27; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next